District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.20

Judicial review.

(a)

Within 10 days after service of a temporary cease and desist order, a financial institution or other party named in the temporary cease and desist order may apply to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for an injunction to set aside, limit, or suspend the order.

(b)

A final order or a final cease and desist order issued under this chapter shall be reviewable by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia. The review of the final order or the final cease and desist order shall be confined to the record of the hearing conducted under § 26-551.13 and to a determination of whether the Commissioner’s order was arbitrary or capricious.

(c)

In addition to any temporary cease and desist order, final order. or final cease and desist order issued by the Commissioner pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section, any final order of the Commissioner or final action of the Department shall be subject to review by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, unless the final order or final agency action is appealable to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals pursuant to § 2-510.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 120, 48 DCR 3244
Nov. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 20-40, § 3, 60 DCR 12304

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-40 added subsection (c).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-40: Section 8 of D.C. Law 20-40 provided that §§ 2 and 3 of the act shall apply as of November 7, 2011.